Nebraska, session 109, LB1083.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Transparency in Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares:
(1) Artificial intelligence has great potential to vastly improve
the lives of all Nebraskans by accelerating our economic growth and
contributing to scientific research;
(2) Experts within the artificial intelligence industry have warned
that artificial intelligence could pose grave and catastrophic risks, and
the State of Nebraska has a strong interest in understanding how the
largest artificial intelligence companies are assessing and mitigating
such risks;
(3) Recent events have illuminated the potential for artificial-
intelligence systems to pose serious risks to minors interacting with
such systems; and
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to create more transparency
around artificial intelligence, but collective safety will depend in part
on large frontier developers taking due care proportional to the scale of
the foreseeable risks.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Transparency in Artificial Intelligence
Risk Management Act:
(1) Affiliate means a person controlling, controlled by, or under
common control with, a specified person, directly or indirectly, through
one or more intermediaries;
(2) Artificial intelligence model means an engineered or machine-
based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for
explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to
generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments;
(3)(a) Catastrophic risk means a foreseeable and material risk that
a frontier developer's development, storage, use, or deployment of a
frontier model will materially contribute to the death of, or serious
injury to, more than fifty people or more than one billion dollars in
-2-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
damage to, or loss of, property arising from a single incident involving
a frontier model doing any of the following:
(i) Providing expert-level assistance in the creation or release of
a chemical, biological, radiological, or nuclear weapon;
(ii) Engaging in conduct with no meaningful human oversight,
intervention, or supervision that is either a cyberattack or, if the
conduct had been committed by a human, would constitute the crime of
murder, assault, extortion, or theft, including theft by deception; or
(iii) Evading the control of its frontier developer or user.
(b) Catastrophic risk does not include a foreseeable and material
risk from any of the following:
(i) Information that a frontier model outputs if the information is
otherwise publicly accessible in a substantially similar form from a
source other than a foundation model;
(ii) Lawful activity of the federal government; or
(iii) Harm caused by a frontier model in combination with other
software if the frontier model did not materially contribute to the harm;
(4) Child safety incident means a covered chatbot engaging in
behavior when interacting with a minor that, if it had been engaged in by
a human, would be deemed to intentionally or recklessly cause death or
bodily injury to such minor or damage the mental health of such minor in
a way that constitutes severe emotional distress;
(5) Child safety risk means a material and foreseeable risk that a
covered chatbot will engage in behavior when interacting with a minor
that, if it had been engaged in by a human, would be deemed to
intentionally or recklessly do any of the following:
(a) Cause death or bodily injury to such minor, including as a
result of self-harm; or
(b) Cause damage to the mental health of such minor that constitutes
severe emotional distress;
(6) Covered chatbot means a service that:
-3-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
(a) Allows an ordinary person to have conversations in which human-
like responses are generated by a foundation model;
(b) Is foreseeably likely to be accessed by minors; and
(c) Has at least one million active users monthly;
(7) Covered risk means a catastrophic risk or a child safety risk;
(8) Critical safety incident means any of the following:
(a) Unauthorized access to, modification of, inadvertent release of,
or exfiltration of, the model weights of a frontier model;
(b) The death of, or serious injury to, more than fifty people, or
more than one billion dollars in damage to, or loss of, property
resulting from the materialization of a catastrophic risk;
(c) Loss of control of a frontier model that causes death, bodily
injury, or that demonstrates materially increased catastrophic risk; or
(d) A frontier model that uses deceptive techniques against the
frontier developer to subvert the controls or monitoring of its frontier
developer outside of the context of an evaluation designed to elicit this
behavior and in a manner that demonstrates materially increased
catastrophic risk;
(9)(a) Deploy means to make a frontier model available to a third
party for use, modification, copying, or combination with other software.
(b) Deploy does not include making a frontier model available to a
third party for the primary purpose of developing or evaluating the
frontier model;
(10) Foundation model means an artificial intelligence model that is
all of the following:
(a) Trained on a broad data set;
(b) Designed for generality of output; and
(c) Adaptable to a wide range of distinctive tasks;
(11) Frontier developer means a person who has trained, or initiated
the training of, a frontier model, with respect to which the person has
used, or intends to use, at least as much computing power to train the
-4-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
frontier model as would meet the technical specifications found in
subdivision (12) of this section, except as otherwise provided by rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 6 of this
act. Accredited postsecondary educational institutions shall not be
considered frontier developers under the act to the extent that such
institutions are developing or using frontier models exclusively for
academic research purposes. If a person subsequently transfers full
intellectual property rights of a frontier model to another person,
including the right to resell the model, and retains none of those rights
for themself, then the receiving person shall be considered the frontier
developer with respect to that frontier model on and after such transfer;
(12) Frontier model means a foundation model that was trained using
a quantity of computing power greater than 10^26 integer or floating-
point operations, except as otherwise provided by rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 6 of this act. The quantity
of computing power described in this subdivision shall include computing
for the original training run and for any subsequent fine-tuning,
reinforcement learning, or other material modifications the developer
applies to a preceding foundation model;
(13) Large chatbot provider means a person who makes a covered
chatbot available in this state and who, together with its affiliates,
collectively had an annual revenue in the preceding calendar year of
twenty-five million dollars or more, except as otherwise specified by
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 6 of
this act.
(14) Large frontier developer means, unless otherwise provided by
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 6 of
this act, a frontier developer who together with its affiliates had a
collective annual revenue in the preceding calender year of five hundred
million dollars or more;
(15) Minor means an individual younger than eighteen years of age;
-5-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
(16) Model weight means a numerical parameter in a frontier model
that is adjusted through training and that helps determine how inputs are
transformed into outputs;
(17) Property means tangible or intangible property;
(18) Public safety and child protection plan means a documented
technical and organizational protocol to manage, assess, and mitigate
covered risks; and
(19) Safety incident means a child safety incident or a critical
safety incident.
Sec. 4. (1) A large frontier developer or large chatbot provider
shall write, implement, comply with, and clearly and conspicuously
publish on its website a public safety and child protection plan that
describes in detail:
(a) For a large frontier developer, how the large frontier
developer:
(i) Defines and assesses thresholds used by the large frontier
developer to identify and assess whether a frontier model has
capabilities that could pose a catastrophic risk, which may include
multiple-tiered thresholds;
(ii) Applies mitigations to address the potential for catastrophic
risks based on the results of the assessments undertaken pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section;
(iii) Reviews assessments of catastrophic risk and adequacy of
mitigations of catastrophic risk as part of the decision to deploy a
frontier model or use it extensively internally;
(iv) Uses third parties to assess the potential for catastrophic
risks and the effectiveness of mitigations of catastrophic risks;
(v) Implements cybersecurity practices to secure unreleased frontier
model weights from unauthorized modification or transfer by internal or
external parties; and
(vi) Assesses and manages catastrophic risk resulting from the
-6-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
internal use of its frontier models, including risks resulting from a
frontier model circumventing oversight mechanisms;
(b) For a large chatbot provider, how the large chatbot provider:
(i) Assesses potential for child safety risks.
(ii) Applies mitigations to address the potential for child safety
risks based on the results of the assessments undertaken pursuant to
subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section; and
(iii) Uses third parties to assess the potential for child safety
risks and the effectiveness of mitigations of child safety risks; and
(c) For both large frontier developers and large chatbot providers,
how the large frontier developer or large chatbot provider:
(i) Incorporates national standards, international standards, and
industry-consensus best practices into its public safety and child
protection plan;
(ii) Revisits and updates the public safety and child protection
plan, including any criteria that trigger updates and how such developer
or provider determines when its foundation models or frontier models are
substantially modified enough to require disclosures pursuant to
subsection (3) or subsection (4) of this section;
(iii) Identifies and responds to safety incidents; and
(iv) Institutes internal governance practices to ensure
implementation of its public safety and child protection plan.
(2) If a large frontier developer or large chatbot provider makes a
material modification to its public safety and child protection plan, the
large frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall clearly and
conspicuously publish on such developer's or provider's website the
modified public safety and child protection plan and a justification for
such modification within thirty days after such material modification.
(3) Before, or concurrently with, integrating a new foundation
model, or a version of an existing foundation model that has been
substantially modified, into a covered chatbot operated by the large
-7-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
chatbot provider, a large chatbot provider shall conspicuously publish on
its website summaries of all of the following:
(i) Assessments of child safety risks conducted pursuant to the
large chatbot provider's public safety and child protection plan;
(ii) The results of such assessments;
(iii) The extent to which third-party evaluators were involved in
such assessments; and
(iv) Other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of the public
safety and child protection plan with respect to child safety risks.
(4)(a) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new frontier model
or a version of an existing frontier model that the large frontier
developer has substantially modified, a large frontier developer shall
conspicuously publish on its website summaries of all of the following:
(i) Assessments of catastrophic risks from the frontier model
conducted pursuant to the large frontier developer's public safety and
child protection plan;
(ii) The results of such assessments;
(iii) The extent to which third-party evaluators were involved in
such assessments; and
(iv) Other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of the public
safety and child protection plan with respect to catastrophic risks from
the frontier model.
(b) A large frontier developer that publishes the information
described in subdivision (5)(a) of this section as part of a larger
document, including a system card or model card, shall be deemed in
compliance with this subsection.
(5)(a)(i) A large frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall
not make a materially false or misleading statement or omission about
covered risks from its activities or its management of covered risks.
(ii) A large frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall not
make a materially false or misleading statement or omission about its
-8-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
implementation of, or compliance with, its public safety and child
protection plan.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not apply to a statement
that was made in good faith and was reasonable under the circumstances.
(6)(a) When a large frontier developer or large chatbot provider
publishes documents to comply with this section, the large frontier
developer or large chatbot provider may make redactions to those
documents that are necessary to protect the large frontier developer's
trade secrets, the large frontier developer's or large chatbot provider's
cybersecurity, public safety, or the national security of the United
States or to comply with any federal or state law.
(b) If a large frontier developer or large chatbot provider redacts
information in a document pursuant to subdivision (6)(a) of this section,
the large frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall describe the
character and justification of the redaction in any published version of
the document to the extent permitted by the concerns that justify
redaction and shall retain the unredacted information for five years.
Sec. 5. (1) The Attorney General shall establish a mechanism to be
used by a frontier developer, a large chatbot provider, or a member of
the public to report a safety incident that includes all of the
following:
(a) The date of the safety incident;
(b) The reasons the incident qualifies as a safety incident; and
(c) A short and plain statement describing the safety incident.
(2) A frontier developer shall report any critical safety incident
pertaining to one of its frontier models to the Attorney General within
fifteen days after discovering the critical safety incident.
(3) If a frontier developer discovers that a critical safety
incident poses an imminent risk of death or serious physical injury, the
frontier developer shall disclose that incident within twenty-four hours
to an authority, including any law enforcement agency or public safety
-9-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
agency with jurisdiction, that is appropriate based on the nature of that
incident and as required by law.
(4) A large chatbot provider shall report any child safety incident
pertaining to one of its covered chatbots to the Attorney General within
fifteen days after discovering the child safety incident.
(5) The Attorney General shall establish a mechanism to be used by a
large frontier developer to confidentially submit summaries of any
assessments of the potential for catastrophic risk resulting from
internal use of its frontier models.
(6) A large frontier developer shall transmit to the Attorney
General a summary of any assessment of catastrophic risk resulting from
internal use of its frontier models no less frequently than every three
months.
(7)(a) The Attorney General may transmit reports of safety
incidents, summaries of assessments of the potential for catastrophic
risk from internal use, and reports from employees made pursuant to
section 6 of this act to the Legislature, the Governor, the federal
government, or appropriate state agencies.
(b) The Attorney General shall strongly consider any risks related
to trade secrets, public safety, cybersecurity of a frontier developer or
large chatbot provider, or national security when transmitting reports.
(8) The Attorney General may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations designating one or more federal laws, regulations, or
guidance documents that meet all of the following conditions for the
purposes of subsection (9) of this section:
(a) The law, regulation, or guidance document imposes or states
standards or requirements for safety incident reporting that are
substantially equivalent to, or stricter than, those required by this
section for critical safety incidents, child safety incidents, or both. A
law, regulation, or guidance document may satisfy this subdivision even
if it does not require safety incident reporting to the State of
-10-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
Nebraska; and
(b) The law, regulation, or guidance document is intended to assess,
detect, or mitigate catastrophic risk, child safety risk, or both.
(9)(a) A frontier developer or large chatbot provider that intends
to comply with all or part of this section by complying with the
requirements of, or meeting the standards stated by, a federal law,
regulation, or guidance document designated pursuant to subsection (8) of
this section by the Attorney General shall declare its intent to do so to
the Attorney General.
(b) After a frontier developer or large chatbot provider has
declared its intent pursuant to subdivision (9)(a) of this section, the
following shall apply:
(i) To the extent that such developer or provider meets the
standards of, or complies with the requirements imposed or stated by, the
designated federal law, regulation, or guidance document, such developer
or provider shall be deemed in compliance with the obligations under this
section pertaining to:
(A) Critical safety incidents, if such designated law, regulation,
or document is intended to assess, detect, or mitigate catastrophic risk;
and
(B) Child safety incidents, if such designated law, regulation, or
document is intended to assess, detect, or mitigate child safety risk;
and
(ii) The failure by such developer or provider to meet the standards
of, or comply with the requirements stated by, such designated law,
regulation, or document, shall be considered a violation of the
Transparency in Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act.
(c) Subdivision (9)(b) of this section shall not apply to a frontier
developer or large chatbot provider to the extent that:
(i) Such developer or provider makes a declaration of intent to the
Attorney General to modify or revoke a declaration of intent under
-11-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
subdivision (9)(a) of this section; or
(ii) The Attorney General revokes a rule or regulation pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.
(10) The Attorney General shall revoke a rule or regulation adopted
under or promulgated under subsection (8) of this section if the
requirements of subsection (8) are no longer met.
Sec. 6. (1) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter,
the Attorney General shall assess recent evidence and developments
relevant to the purposes of the Transparency in Artificial Intelligence
Risk Management Act and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
update definitions for any of the following terms for the purposes of the
act to ensure that such definitions accurately reflect technological
developments, scientific literature, and widely accepted national and
international standards:
(a) Frontier model, so that such definition applies to foundation
models at the frontier of artificial intelligence development;
(b) Frontier developer, so that such definition applies to
developers of frontier models who are themselves at the frontier of
artificial intelligence development;
(c) Large frontier developer so that such definition applies to
well-resourced frontier developers; and
(d) Large chatbot provider so that such definition applies to well-
resourced companies developing covered chatbots that may pose child
safety risks.
(2) In adopting and promulgating rules and regulations pursuant to
this section, the Attorney General shall take into account all of the
following:
(a) Similar thresholds used in international standards or federal
law, guidance, or regulations for the management of catastrophic risks or
child safety risks. The Attorney General shall align any updated
definition with a definition adopted in a federal law or regulation to
-12-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
the extent that it is consistent with the purposes of the Transparency in
Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act;
(b) Input from stakeholders, such as academic and technology
industry professionals, the open-source community, and governmental
entities;
(c) The extent to which a person will be able to determine, before
beginning to train or deploy a foundation model, whether that person will
be subject to the definition as a frontier developer or as a large
frontier developer with an aim toward allowing earlier determinations if
possible;
(d) The complexity of determining whether a person or foundation
model is covered, with an aim toward allowing simpler determinations if
possible;
(e) The external verifiability of determining whether a person or
foundation model is covered, with an aim toward definitions that are
verifiable by parties other than the frontier developer; and
(f) Thresholds used by other states in similar laws.
Sec. 7. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Adverse action means the discharge of an employee, a threat
against an employee, or any other act against an employee that negatively
affects the employee's employment;
(b) Applicant means a prospective employee applying for employment;
and
(c) Employee means an individual employed by a large frontier
developer or large chatbot provider.
(2) A frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall not take
adverse action against or otherwise penalize an employee for disclosing
information to the Attorney General, a federal authority, a person with
authority over the employee, or another employee who has authority to
investigate, discover, or correct the reported issue, if the employee has
reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses either of the
-13-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
following:
(a) The frontier developer's or large chatbot provider's activities
pose a specific and substantial danger to the public health or safety or
to the health or safety of a minor; or
(b) The frontier developer or large chatbot provider has violated
the Transparency in Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act.
(3) A frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall not require
an employee or applicant to waive or limit any protection granted under
this section as a condition of continued employment or of applying for or
receiving an offer of employment. Any agreement to waive any right or
protection under the act is against the public policy of this state and
is void and unenforceable.
(4) A frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall not
retaliate, discriminate or take adverse action against an employee or
applicant because the employee or applicant testifies, assists, or
participates in an investigation, proceeding, or action concerning a
violation of the Transparency in Artificial Intelligence Risk Management
Act.
(5)(a) A large frontier developer shall provide a reasonable
internal process through which an employee may anonymously disclose
information to the large frontier developer if the employee believes in
good faith that the information indicates that the large frontier
developer's activities (i) pose a specific and substantial threat to the
public health or safety or to the health or safety of a minor or (b) that
the large frontier developer or large chatbot provider has violated the
Transparency in Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act. Such
internal process shall include providing a monthly update to the person
who made the disclosure regarding the status of the large frontier
developer's investigation of the disclosure and the actions taken by the
large frontier developer in response to the disclosure. Except as
provided in subdivision (ii) of this subsection, the disclosures and
-14-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
responses of the process required by this subdivision shall be shared
with officers and directors of the large frontier developer at least once
each quarter.
(b) If an employee has alleged wrongdoing by an officer or director
of the large frontier developer in a disclosure or response, subdivision
(a) of this subsection shall not apply with respect to that officer or
director.
(6) Upon violation of this section, an aggrieved employee or
applicant may, in addition to any other available remedy, institute a
civil action within one year after the date of the alleged violation or
the discovery of the alleged violation, whichever is later. The employee
or applicant shall file an action directly in the district court of the
county where such alleged violation occurred. The district court shall
file and try such case as any other civil action, and any successful
complainant shall be entitled to appropriate relief, including temporary
or permanent injunctive relief, general and special damages, and
reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
Sec. 8. (1) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce the
Transparency in Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act. A large
frontier developer that violates the act shall be subject to a civil
penalty in an amount dependent upon the severity of the violation that
does not exceed one million dollars per violation. A large chatbot
provider that violates the act shall be subject to a civil penalty in an
amount dependent upon the severity of the violation that does not exceed
fifty thousand dollars per violation.
(2) Any penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 9. The duties and obligations imposed by the Transparency in
Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Act are cumulative with any other
duties or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed
-15-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under another
law and do not limit any rights or remedies under existing law.
Sec. 10. The Juvenile Mental Health Support Fund is created. The
fund shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services
and shall be used for the programming and facilities associated with
providing juvenile mental health services. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 11. Section 84-712.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-712.05 The following records, unless publicly disclosed in an
open court, open administrative proceeding, or open meeting or disclosed
by a public entity pursuant to its duties, may be withheld from the
public by the lawful custodian of the records:
(1) Personal information in records regarding a student, prospective
student, or former student of any educational institution or exempt
school that has effectuated an election not to meet state approval or
accreditation requirements pursuant to section 79-1601 when such records
are maintained by and in the possession of a public entity, other than
routine directory information specified and made public consistent with
20 U.S.C. 1232g, as such section existed on February 1, 2013, and
regulations adopted thereunder;
(2) Medical records, other than records of births and deaths and
except as provided in subdivisions (5) and (27) of this section, in any
form concerning any person; records of elections filed under section
44-2821; and patient safety work product under the Patient Safety
Improvement Act;
(3) Trade secrets, academic and scientific research work which is in
progress and unpublished, and other proprietary or commercial information
which if released would give advantage to business competitors and serve
-16-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
no public purpose;
(4) Records which represent the work product of an attorney and the
public body involved which are related to preparation for litigation,
labor negotiations, or claims made by or against the public body or which
are confidential communications as defined in section 27-503;
(5) Records developed or received by law enforcement agencies and
other public bodies charged with duties of investigation or examination
of persons, institutions, or businesses, when the records constitute a
part of the examination, investigation, intelligence information,
complaints or inquiries from residents of this state or other interested
persons, informant identification, or strategic or tactical information
used in law enforcement training, except that this subdivision shall not
apply to records so developed or received:
(a) Relating to the presence of and amount or concentration of
alcohol or drugs in any body fluid of any person; or
(b) Relating to the cause of or circumstances surrounding the death
of an employee arising from or related to his or her employment if, after
an investigation is concluded, a family member of the deceased employee
makes a request for access to or copies of such records. This subdivision
does not require access to or copies of informant identification, the
names or identifying information of members of the public making
complaints or inquiries, other information which would compromise an
ongoing criminal investigation, or information which may be withheld from
the public under another provision of law. For purposes of this
subdivision, family member means a spouse, child, parent, sibling,
grandchild, or grandparent by blood, marriage, or adoption;
(6) The identity and personal identifying information of an alleged
victim of sexual assault or sex trafficking as provided in section
29-4316;
(7) Appraisals or appraisal information and negotiation records
concerning the purchase or sale, by a public body, of any interest in
-17-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
real or personal property, prior to completion of the purchase or sale;
(8) Personal information in records regarding personnel of public
bodies other than salaries and routine directory information;
(9) Information solely pertaining to protection of the security of
public property and persons on or within public property, such as
specific, unique vulnerability assessments or specific, unique response
plans, either of which is intended to prevent or mitigate criminal acts
the public disclosure of which would create a substantial likelihood of
endangering public safety or property; computer or communications network
schema, passwords, and user identification names; guard schedules; lock
combinations; or public utility infrastructure specifications or design
drawings the public disclosure of which would create a substantial
likelihood of endangering public safety or property, unless otherwise
provided by state or federal law;
(10) Information that relates details of physical and cyber assets
of critical energy infrastructure or critical electric infrastructure,
including (a) specific engineering, vulnerability, or detailed design
information about proposed or existing critical energy infrastructure or
critical electric infrastructure that (i) relates details about the
production, generation, transportation, transmission, or distribution of
energy, (ii) could be useful to a person in planning an attack on such
critical infrastructure, and (iii) does not simply give the general
location of the critical infrastructure and (b) the identity of personnel
whose primary job function makes such personnel responsible for (i)
providing or granting individuals access to physical or cyber assets or
(ii) operating and maintaining physical or cyber assets, if a reasonable
person, knowledgeable of the electric utility or energy industry, would
conclude that the public disclosure of such identity could create a
substantial likelihood of risk to such physical or cyber assets.
Subdivision (10)(b) of this section shall not apply to the identity of a
chief executive officer, general manager, vice president, or board member
-18-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
of a public entity that manages critical energy infrastructure or
critical electric infrastructure. The lawful custodian of the records
must provide a detailed job description for any personnel whose identity
is withheld pursuant to subdivision (10)(b) of this section. For purposes
of subdivision (10) of this section, critical energy infrastructure and
critical electric infrastructure mean existing and proposed systems and
assets, including a system or asset of the bulk-power system, whether
physical or virtual, the incapacity or destruction of which would
negatively affect security, economic security, public health or safety,
or any combination of such matters;
(11) The security standards, procedures, policies, plans,
specifications, diagrams, access lists, and other security-related
records of the Lottery Division of the Department of Revenue and those
persons or entities with which the division has entered into contractual
relationships. Nothing in this subdivision shall allow the division to
withhold from the public any information relating to:
(a) Amounts paid persons or entities with which the division has
entered into contractual relationships;
(b) Amounts of prizes paid; or
(c) The name of any prize winner awarded a prize of less than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars, and the city, village, or county where
the prize winner resides;
(12) With respect to public utilities and except as provided in
sections 43-512.06 and 70-101, personally identified private customer
account payment and customer use information, credit information on
others supplied in confidence, and customer lists;
(13) Records or portions of records kept by a publicly funded
library which, when examined with or without other records, reveal the
identity of any library patron using the library's materials or services;
(14) Correspondence, memoranda, and records of telephone calls
related to the performance of duties by a member of the Legislature in
-19-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
whatever form. The lawful custodian of the correspondence, memoranda, and
records of telephone calls, upon approval of the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, shall release the correspondence, memoranda, and
records of telephone calls which are not designated as sensitive or
confidential in nature to any person performing an audit of the
Legislature. A member's correspondence, memoranda, and records of
confidential telephone calls related to the performance of his or her
legislative duties shall only be released to any other person with the
explicit approval of the member;
(15) Records or portions of records kept by public bodies which
would reveal the location, character, or ownership of any known
archaeological, historical, or paleontological site in Nebraska when
necessary to protect the site from a reasonably held fear of theft,
vandalism, or trespass. This section shall not apply to the release of
information for the purpose of scholarly research, examination by other
public bodies for the protection of the resource or by recognized tribes,
the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act, or
the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act;
(16) Records or portions of records kept by public bodies which
maintain collections of archaeological, historical, or paleontological
significance which reveal the names and addresses of donors of such
articles of archaeological, historical, or paleontological significance
unless the donor approves disclosure, except as the records or portions
thereof may be needed to carry out the purposes of the Unmarked Human
Burial Sites and Skeletal Remains Protection Act or the federal Native
American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act;
(17) Library, archive, and museum materials acquired from
nongovernmental entities and preserved solely for reference, research, or
exhibition purposes, for the duration specified in subdivision (17)(b) of
this section, if:
(a) Such materials are received by the public custodian as a gift,
-20-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
purchase, bequest, or transfer; and
(b) The donor, seller, testator, or transferor conditions such gift,
purchase, bequest, or transfer on the materials being kept confidential
for a specified period of time;
(18) Job application materials submitted by applicants, other than
finalists or a priority candidate for a position described in section
85-106.06 selected using the enhanced public scrutiny process in section
85-106.06, who have applied for employment by any public body as defined
in section 84-1409. For purposes of this subdivision, (a) job application
materials means employment applications, resumes, reference letters, and
school transcripts and (b) finalist means any applicant who is not an
applicant for a position described in section 85-106.06 and (i) who
reaches the final pool of applicants, numbering four or more, from which
the successful applicant is to be selected, (ii) who is an original
applicant when the final pool of applicants numbers less than four, or
(iii) who is an original applicant and there are four or fewer original
applicants;
(19)(a) Records obtained by the Public Employees Retirement Board
pursuant to section 84-1512 and (b) records maintained by the board of
education of a Class V school district and obtained by the board of
trustees or the Public Employees Retirement Board for the administration
of a retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act pursuant to section 79-989;
(20) Social security numbers; credit card, charge card, or debit
card numbers and expiration dates; and financial account numbers supplied
to state and local governments;
(21) Information exchanged between a jurisdictional utility and city
pursuant to section 66-1867;
(22) Draft records obtained by the Nebraska Retirement Systems
Committee of the Legislature and the Governor from Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems pursuant to subsection (4) of section
-21-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
84-1503;
(23) All prescription drug information submitted pursuant to section
71-2454, all data contained in the prescription drug monitoring system,
and any report obtained from data contained in the prescription drug
monitoring system;
(24) Information obtained by any government entity, whether federal,
state, county, or local, regarding firearm registration, possession,
sale, or use that is obtained for purposes of an application permitted or
required by law or contained in a permit or license issued by such
entity. Such information shall be available upon request to any federal,
state, county, or local law enforcement agency;
(25) The security standards, procedures, policies, plans,
specifications, diagrams, and access lists and other security-related
records of the State Racing and Gaming Commission, those persons or
entities with which the commission has entered into contractual
relationships, and the names of any individuals placed on the list of
self-excluded persons with the commission as provided in section 9-1118.
Nothing in this subdivision shall allow the commission to withhold from
the public any information relating to the amount paid any person or
entity with which the commission has entered into a contractual
relationship, the amount of any prize paid, the name of the prize winner,
and the city, village, or county where the prize winner resides;
(26) Records relating to the nature, location, or function of
cybersecurity by the State of Nebraska or any of its political
subdivisions or any other public entity subject to sections 84-712 to
84-712.09, including, but not limited to, devices, programs, or systems
designed to protect computer, information technology, or communications
systems against terrorist or other attacks. The Nebraska Information
Technology Commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
implement this subdivision;
(27) Vital event records, unless all information designated as
-22-

LB1083 LB1083
2026 2026
confidential under the Vital Statistics Act or all personally
identifiable information is redacted by the Department of Health and
Human Services;
(28) Information or records from historical indexes within one
hundred years after the event date of the information or record; and
(29) The certificate number for any vital event certificate; and .
(30) A notification or summary of assessment submitted under section
5 of this act or a disclosure made pursuant to section 7 of this act.
Sec. 12. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 13. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 14. Original section 84-712.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-23-